Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 1 STATE, COUNTY, AND CITY HIGHWAY SYSTEMS
43-2-122. State inspection of county projects.

Whenever any county or group of counties undertakes the construction of any highway project which involves the expenditure of highway users tax funds and federal funds, it is the duty of the department of transportation to inspect such projects at such times as the department of transportation considers necessary for the purpose of determining that such project is being built to the prescribed standard.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 520, § 22.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-22.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-22.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1103, § 140, effective July 1.

43-2-123. City street systems.

There shall be established in each city, city and county, and incorporated town a system of streets to be known as the city street system. It shall not include any street established by law as a part of the state highway system.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 521, § 23.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-23.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-23.

43-2-124. City streets defined - maintenance.

The city street system shall consist of all streets open and used, which shall include the primary system of major streets to be designated arterial streets, and a secondary system to be designated local service streets.

Arterial streets are those streets carrying general traffic within the city and providing communication with surrounding territory and which are not part of the federal-aid and state highway connecting links within the city.

Local service streets are all streets within a city open to public travel and which are not a part of the federal-aid connecting links, state highways, or streets designated as arterial streets.

The city streets system, both arterial and local service streets, shall be constructed and maintained by the respective city, city and county, or incorporated town.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 521, § 24.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-24.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-24.

43-2-125. Adoption of street systems - reports.

The arterial streets and local service streets in any town, city, or city and county shall constitute its city street system. The system of arterial streets shall be selected in the following manner:

On or before December 31, 1953, the city council, local governing body, or designated officer of each incorporated town, city, or city and county shall determine the total mileage of its city street system, and prepare a certification showing the amount of total mileage.

The city council, local governing body, or designated officer of each municipality shall then cause a map to be prepared showing each street in the city arterial system and designating each street by appropriate number for the purpose of identification and shall cause notice of intention to adopt said map as the official map of such system to be given, which notice shall specify the time and place at which all interested persons shall be heard. Such notice of intention shall be published once a week for two successive weeks preceding the date of such hearing in a newspaper of general circulation in the city, or in case of cities or towns which have no newspaper published within their limits, notice of intention shall be published by placing said notice in a conspicuous place in such city or incorporated town generally used for publishing such public notices.

After such hearing the city council, local governing body, or designated officer shall certify such map, with any changes or revisions deemed to be advisable, as the official map of the arterial street system.

On or before December 31, 1953, each town, city, or city and county shall file copies of the following information with the department of transportation:

Certification of the total mileage of streets in its city street system as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1);

Certification adopting its arterial street system, together with a copy of the map of the arterial street system as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection (1).

Changes in total mileage and arterial mileage shall be made in a similar manner and all such changes shall be reported as made. Each annual report as required in section 43-2-132 shall include all changes or a statement that no changes have been made.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 521, § 25.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-25.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-25.

L. 91:

IP(1)(d) amended, p. 1103, § 141, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For publication of legal notices, see article 70 of title 24.

43-2-126. Street supervisors - duties. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 53:

p. 522, § 26.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-26.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-26.

L. 89:

Entire section repealed, p. 1293, § 18, effective April 6.

43-2-127. Contracts for street supervision - report. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 53:

p. 523, § 27.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-27.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-27.

L. 89:

Entire section repealed, p. 1293, § 18, effective April 6.

43-2-128. Municipalities exempt from street supervision sections. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 53:

p. 523, § 28.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-28.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-28.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 1272, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 89:

Entire section repealed, p. 1293, § 18, effective April 6.

43-2-129. Accounting by municipalities - unexpended funds - matching federal aid.

All amounts paid to each city, city and county, or incorporated town out of the highway users tax fund shall be accounted for as provided in this part 1.

A city, city and county, or incorporated town, if moneys paid from the highway users tax fund are not expended in any fiscal year, may carry over and rebudget such moneys for the succeeding year; or it may make expenditures in anticipation of receipt of these moneys and receive credit for them in the year in which the moneys are received.

In the event that any funds become available from the federal government for expenditure by the cities and incorporated towns in conjunction with funds which have accrued to such cities and incorporated towns for the construction, alteration, repair, or improvement of any street within the limits of said cities or incorporated towns, the city council or local governing authority of the respective cities and incorporated towns, upon the approval by the department of transportation, may use such funds which have accrued to them from the highway users tax fund for the purpose of matching the federal funds becoming available; if the city council or local governing authority of such city or incorporated town has, by proper resolution, filed in duplicate with the department of transportation and approved by said department, determined that the street construction, alteration, repair, or improvement to be performed in such city or incorporated town conforms in all respects to the requirements necessary for the use of such funds from the federal government and if all such funds becoming available are expended only as provided by law.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 523, § 29.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-29.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-29.

L. 91:

(3) amended, p. 1103, § 142, effective July 1.

43-2-130. Street budgets.

In each city, city and county, and incorporated town, the street supervisor or authorized budget officer, in compliance with the local government budget law, shall prepare each year a tentative street budget covering all proposed expenditures for the ensuing calendar year for the city street system. He shall submit the same as his recommended budget for the city street system to the city council or local governing authority for approval.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 524, § 30.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-30.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-30.

Cross references:

For the local government budget law, see part 1 of article 1 of title 29.

43-2-131. Municipal allocations - delinquent reports - grace period.

The state treasurer or any other state officer so designated shall make complete allocations from highway user revenues to only those cities, cities and counties, or towns which have complied with all the requirements of this part 1. The state agency or department designated in this part 1 to receive reports shall inform the cities, cities and counties, or towns in writing, by certified mail, of any delinquencies in reporting and shall forward a copy of such notice to the state treasurer. Delinquent cities, cities and counties, or towns shall be allowed a grace period of sixty days after date in which to rectify the delinquency. If the required reports have not been received at the end of the sixty-day grace period, the state treasurer shall withhold the moneys due to such cities, cities and counties, or towns until he has been informed that the required reports have been received. Payments withheld will be paid to the cities, cities and counties, or towns upon receipt of the delinquent reports.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 524, § 31.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-31.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-31.

L. 71:

p. 1138, § 5.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1936, § 3, effective July 1.

43-2-132. Annual municipal reports.

On or before the thirtieth day of June of each year, every city, city and county, and incorporated town shall cause to be made and filed with the highway maintenance division a complete report of the expenditures of all moneys applied to city street systems during the calendar year ending on the thirty-first day of December next preceding. The division shall prescribe the form and contents of such report.

The report shall contain the following:

A detailed statement identifying the separate amounts and sources of all moneys available during the calendar year covered by the report, including moneys made available by the United States government, the state, the county, and any other governmental agency, and moneys available from bond issues, special assessments, tax levy, or any other source whatever for street or road purposes;

A detailed statement of all expenditures during the calendar year covered by the report for street and road purposes, including obligations incurred but not yet paid. The statement shall contain uniform categories to be prescribed by the department of transportation, such categories to include but not be limited to expenditures for rights-of-way or other property, construction, maintenance, acquisition of equipment, and administration. The statement shall also set forth the amount of funds on hand at the beginning of the calendar year covered by the report, the manner in which highway users tax fund moneys and the county road and bridge fund were spent during such calendar year, and the amount of any unexpended funds remaining at the close of such calendar year. The department of transportation shall prescribe such other expenditure categories and such other information as may be deemed necessary by the department to fully disclose the nature and extent of all transactions by any city, city and county, or incorporated town relating to streets and roads. Any moneys which have become available to any city, city and county, and incorporated town for expenditure on roads and bridges by virtue of a condition placed on any type of land use approval shall be accounted for separately and said expenditures shall be limited to roads and bridges in connection with such land use project.

The highway maintenance division shall prepare detailed instructions for the uniform reporting of receipts and expenditures of all moneys to city streets and roads.

The highway maintenance division shall annually tabulate and compile all such reports and statements received from the cities, city and counties, and incorporated towns and shall publish these data in accordance with the provisions of section 24-1-136, C.R.S.

On or before March 1 of each year, each city, city and county, and incorporated town shall submit to the department of transportation the certification prepared as provided by section 43-2-125 showing all changes in total mileage and arterial mileage having been made during the calendar year ending on December 31 next preceding.

Information concerning the condition of the streets, roads, and highways submitted pursuant to section 43-1-115 (2), shall be reported in conjunction with the report required by paragraph (a) of this subsection (5).

The reports required by this section shall be audited in accordance with the provisions of part 6 of article 1 of title 29, C.R.S., and such reports shall be included as supplementary information in the annual audit report.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 524, § 32.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-32.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-32.

L. 64:

p. 169, § 132.

L. 67:

p. 920, § 2.

L. 71:

pp. 1139, 1143, §§ 6, 2.

L. 72:

p. 617, § 150.

L. 77:

(5) amended, p. 1936, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(4) amended, p. 845, § 84, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(5) amended, p. 1210, § 3, effective April 21.

L. 89:

(2)(b) amended and (6) added, p. 1261, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(1), (2)(b), and (3) to (5) amended, p. 1103, § 143, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(1) amended, p. 1098, § 17, effective June 1.

L. 2015:

(1), (3), and (4) amended, (HB 15-1209), ch. 64, p. 177, § 11, effective March 30.

43-2-132.5. Maintenance of local effort - highways. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 89, 1st Ex. Sess.:

Entire section added, p. 60, § 16, effective August 1.

L. 91:

(4) amended, p. 1104, § 144, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section repealed, p. 96, § 1, effective March 18.

43-2-133. State inspection of municipal projects.

Whenever any city, city and county, or incorporated town undertakes the construction of any street project which involves the expenditure of state funds and federal funds, it is the duty of the department of transportation to inspect such projects at such times as the department of transportation deems necessary for the purposes of determining whether such projects are being built to the recommended standards.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 525, § 33.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-33.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-33.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1105, § 145, effective July 1.

43-2-134. Certification of designations - notice of change.

Within thirty days after December 31, 1979, the department of transportation shall certify by brief description in duplicate to the governing body and to the clerk of each municipality which streets, together with the bridges or other structures thereon, if any, in such municipality are presently designated as part of the state highway system as defined in this part 1.

Thereafter, the department of transportation shall inform each municipality of any change in designation that has occurred within its jurisdiction not later than sixty working days after the change.

No change shall be made in the designation of such street as a part of the state highway system without prior notice to the municipality and without opportunity for hearing before the commission.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 525, § 34.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-34.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-34.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 1596, § 1, effective April 25.

L. 91:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1105, § 146, effective July 1.

43-2-135. Division of authority over streets.

The jurisdiction, control, and duty of the state, cities, cities and counties, and incorporated towns with respect to streets which are a part of the state highway system is as follows:

The city, city and county, and incorporated town shall exercise full responsibility for and control over any such street beyond and including the curbs and, if no curb is installed, beyond the traveled way, its contiguous shoulders, and appurtenances; except that the regulation and control of driveways shall be subject to the provisions of section 43-2-147.

The department of transportation has authority to prohibit the suspension of signs, banners, or decorations above the portion of such streets between the curbs or portion used for highway purposes up to a vertical height of twenty feet above the surface of the roadway.

The city, city and county, or incorporated town at its own expense shall maintain all underground facilities in such streets and has the right to construct such underground facilities as may be necessary in such streets.

The city, city and county, or incorporated town has the right to grant the privilege to open the surface of any such street, but all damages occasioned thereby shall promptly be repaired either by the city, city and county, or incorporated town itself or at its direction.

The city, city and county, or incorporated town at its own expense shall provide street illumination and shall clean all such streets, including storm sewer inlets and catch basins.

The department of transportation has the right to utilize all storm sewers on such highways without cost; and if new storm sewer facilities are necessary in construction of streets by the department of transportation, the cost of such facilities shall be borne by the state and municipality as may be mutually agreed upon between the department of transportation and the local governing body of the city, city and county, or incorporated town.

Cities, cities and counties, and incorporated towns shall regulate and enforce all traffic and parking restrictions on streets which are state highways, but all regulations adopted after December 31, 1979, shall be approved in writing by the department of transportation before becoming effective on such streets; except that such regulations shall become effective on such streets sixty days after receipt for review by the department of transportation if not disapproved in writing by said department during that sixty-day period.

The department of transportation shall erect, control, and maintain at state expense all route markers and directional signs, except street signs on those streets.

The department of transportation shall install, operate, maintain, and control at state expense all traffic control signals, signs, and traffic control devices on state highways in cities, the city and county of Denver, the city and county of Broomfield, and incorporated towns. No local authority shall erect or maintain any stop sign or traffic control signal at any location so as to require the traffic on any state highway to stop before entering or crossing any intersecting highway unless approval in writing has first been obtained from the department of transportation. For the purpose of this paragraph (i), striping, lane-marking, and channelization are considered traffic control devices.

Rights-of-way for such street shall be acquired by either the city, city and county, or incorporated town or by the state as is mutually agreed upon. Costs of acquiring such rights-of-way may be at the sole expense of the state or the city, city and county, or incorporated town, or both, as may be mutually agreed. Title to all rights-of-way so acquired shall vest in the city, city and county, or incorporated town, or the state, according to the agreement under which said rights-of-way were secured.

The department of transportation is authorized to acquire rights-of-way by purchase, gift, or condemnation for any such streets, highways, and bridges. Any such condemnation proceeding shall be exercised in the manner provided by law for condemnation proceedings to acquire lands required for state highways. Nothing in this section shall be construed as abrogating the rights of home rule cities to acquire lands for state purposes in the manner set forth in the charter of said cities.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 526, § 35.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-35.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-35.

L. 71:

p. 202, § 10.

L. 74:

(1)(i) amended, p. 358, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

(1)(g) amended, p. 1598, § 2, effective May 18.

L. 80:

(1)(a) amended, p. 798, § 66, effective June 5.

L. 91:

(1)(b), (1)(f) to (1)(i), and (1)(k) amended, p. 1105, § 147, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(1)(i) amended, p. 273, § 27, effective November 15.

43-2-136. Department makes rules for rating.

The department of transportation shall promulgate and adopt rules and regulations for a practical system of rating roads, streets, and highways based on sufficiency rating studies for the systems under its specific jurisdiction as follows:

Priorities for construction on the state highway system as designated by this part 1 shall be determined by the transportation commission not later than May thirtieth of the year preceding the year during which said construction is to be undertaken.

The transportation commission in establishing priorities shall make use of a sufficiency rating which shall take into consideration traffic volume, composition of traffic, width of the roadbed, pavement type, and such other construction factors as it deems necessary in order to adequately compare existing highway facilities with the known desirable standards for highways which should apply.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 528, § 36.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-36.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-36.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1106, § 148, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For rule-making procedures, see article 4 of title 24.

43-2-137. Counties submit priorities - instructions.

The boards of county commissioners of the various counties in Colorado and the city council of the city and county of Denver and the city council of the city and county of Broomfield shall annually submit to the commission priorities for the construction of roads and streets within their specific jurisdiction on the state highway system, plus all proposed projects not a part of the state highway system but utilizing federal funding. For purposes of this section and section 43-2-138, the city and county of Denver and the city and county of Broomfield shall be considered counties.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 528, § 37.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-37.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-37.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 1596, § 2, effective April 25.

L. 2001:

Entire section amended, p. 273, § 28, effective November 15.

43-2-138. Municipalities submit priorities - instructions.

The city council or local governing authority of each incorporated place situated in Colorado shall annually submit to the commission, directly or through the board of county commissioners, priorities for the construction of roads and streets within its specific jurisdiction on the state highway system, plus all proposed projects not a part of the state highway system but utilizing federal funding.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 528, § 38.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-38.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-38.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 1597, § 3, effective April 25.

43-2-139. Roadside advertising on county roads.

The board of county commissioners of each county has the power to require all persons placing or maintaining road signs, guide boards, billboards, and bulletin boards, of any kind on any road constituting a part of the county highway system which do not conform to the standards designated by the transportation commission, to remove the same, and if such persons do not comply with such requirements, the board of county commissioners has the power to remove said signs and boards. Where said signs and boards are erected outside the right-of-way of any county road in such a manner that any portion of said sign or board projects onto the right-of-way of said county road, the board of county commissioners has the power to remove as much of said sign or board projecting onto said right-of-way as is necessary to keep said right-of-way free and clear of obstruction.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 529, § 39.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-39.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-39.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1107, § 149, effective July 1.

43-2-140. Roadside advertising on state highways. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 53:

p. 529, § 40.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-40.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-40.

L. 81:

Entire section repealed, p. 2019, § 4, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For provisions concerning roadside advertising, see the "Outdoor Advertising Act", part 4 of article 1 of this title 43.

43-2-141. Violation of sections - penalties.

Any person or corporation who places or maintains any road signs, guide boards, billboards, or bulletin boards on any road constituting the county system in violation of section 43-2-139 commits a civil infraction. Any person or corporation which injures, defaces, or destroys any road sign placed on any county road, as provided by law, commits a civil infraction.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 529, § 41.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-41.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-41.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 2019, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3325, § 775, effective March 1, 2022.

Cross references:

For the penalty for a civil infraction, see § 18-1.3-503.

43-2-142. Jurisdiction.

All courts of record having jurisdiction of misdemeanors have jurisdiction to try any case arising from the violation of this part 1 or any provision thereof.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 529, § 42.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-42.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-42.

L. 64:

p. 312, § 283.

43-2-143. Obstructing highway view - penalty. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 53:

p. 530, § 43.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-43.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-43.

L. 81:

Entire section repealed, p. 2019, § 4, effective July 1.

43-2-144. Intergovernmental highway contracts.

The transportation commission, counties, and municipalities have the following powers, in addition to powers which they may already have, to contract with one another concerning streets, roads, and highways.

The board of county commissioners of any county is authorized to contract with the transportation commission or with any city or town within the county, or with both the transportation commission and a city or town, for the construction or maintenance, or both, of county or state highways within the county or within the county and the city or town. Adjoining counties may also contract with each other for construction or maintenance, or both, of public highways where roads in one county may be constructed or maintained, or both, more economically by an adjoining county.

Towns and cities are authorized to contract with the transportation commission or with the board of county commissioners, or with both the transportation commission and the board of county commissioners, for the construction or maintenance, or both, of city streets or county or state highways within the town or city.

Such contracts may extend for an indefinite period of time. The expenditures to be required each year shall be separately budgeted, and where the contract may extend over more than one budgeting period, the entire amount required by such contract need not be budgeted before such contract is made.

Existing valid contracts between the parties enumerated in subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall not automatically be voided by the adoption of this part 1 but are expressly confirmed and ratified; but, upon the agreement of all parties to a contract, such contract may be modified in accordance with this part 1.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 530, § 44.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-44.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-44.

L. 91:

(1) to (3) amended, p. 1107, § 150, effective July 1.

43-2-145. Transportation legislation review - committee - definition.

The transportation legislation review committee is hereby created in order to give guidance and direction to:

The department of transportation in the development of the state transportation system and to provide legislative overview of and input into such development;

The department of revenue in the licensing of drivers and registration and titling of motor vehicles; and

Any state agency or political subdivision of Colorado that regulates motor vehicles or traffic, including, without limitation, penalties imposed for violating traffic statutes and rules.

The committee shall meet at least once each year to review transportation, traffic, and motor vehicle legislation and may consult with experts in the fields of traffic regulation, the licensing of drivers, the registration and titling of motor vehicles, and highway construction and planning and may consult with the personnel of the department of transportation or the department of revenue as may be necessary. All personnel of the department of transportation, the department of revenue, or any state agency or political subdivision of Colorado that regulates motor vehicles or traffic shall cooperate with the committee and with any persons assisting the committee in carrying out its duties pursuant to this section. The committee may review any phase of department of transportation operations, including planning and construction of highway projects, prior to and during the completion of such projects.

Repealed.

The committee may also conduct a post-operation review of such projects to determine whether the project was completed in the most cost-effective and efficient manner. The committee may require the department of transportation to prepare and adopt five-, ten-, and fifteen-year plans for the development of the state transportation system, and the committee shall monitor the progress of such plans. The committee may also require financial or performance audits to be conducted. Upon completion of its review of the transportation laws, the committee shall make recommendations to the governor and to the general assembly for such additional legislation as it deems necessary. The committee shall also develop and make recommendations concerning the financing of the state transportation system. Legislation recommended by the committee shall be treated as legislation recommended by an interim legislative committee for purposes of any introduction deadlines or bill limitations imposed by the joint rules of the general assembly.

Repealed.

(1.3) (a) (I) For purposes of this subsection (1.3), "agency" means any state, regional, or local agency, authority, department, district, or organization, other than an individual municipality or county, that:

Is responsible for researching, planning, developing, or improving transportation systems, mass transit systems, or regional plans that include the provision of mass transit within the jurisdiction of the agency; and

Has or may have overlapping or coterminous jurisdiction with another agency.

The term "agency" includes, without limitation, the department of transportation, the regional transportation district, the Colorado intermountain fixed guideway authority, and the Denver regional council of governments.

Each agency shall share information and coordinate efforts with other agencies in the research, planning, and development of mass transit systems to avoid the creation of duplicative or conflicting mass transit systems in the state. The committee may review the operations of any agency to ensure compliance with the provisions of this paragraph (b). In connection with the review of the committee, any agency required to share information and coordinate efforts in accordance with this paragraph (b) shall report to the committee no later than August 15, 2001, and each August 15 thereafter through August 15, 2009, and no later than August 15, 2011, and each August 15 thereafter regarding compliance with this paragraph (b).

(1.5) The committee may review any phase of operations of any public highway authority created pursuant to part 5 of article 4 of this title, including planning and construction of public highway projects, prior to and during the completion of such projects. The committee may also conduct a post-operation review of a project to determine whether the project was completed in the most cost-effective and efficient manner. The committee may require any public highway authority to prepare and adopt long-range plans for the development of the public highways, and the committee shall monitor the progress of such plans. The committee may also require the state auditor to conduct a financial or performance audit of any public highway authority.

(1.6) and (1.8) Repealed.

(1.9) The committee may review any phase of operations of any regional transportation authority created pursuant to part 6 of article 4 of this title, including the planning and construction of regional transportation systems, prior to and during the completion of such systems. The committee may also conduct a post-operation review of any system to determine whether the system was completed in the most cost-effective and efficient manner. The committee may require any regional transportation authority to prepare and adopt long-range plans for the development of regional transportation systems, and the committee shall monitor the progress of the plans. The committee may also require financial or performance audits to be conducted.

Repealed.

(2.5) (a) Effective January 1, 2001, the committee shall be comprised of the members of the transportation and energy committee of reference of the house of representatives and the members of the transportation committee of reference of the senate. The chairman of the senate transportation committee shall be the chairman in even-numbered years and vice-chairman in odd-numbered years. The chairman of the house transportation and energy committee shall be chairman in odd-numbered years and vice-chairman in even-numbered years.

The members of the respective committees of reference shall receive the usual per diem and necessary travel and subsistence expenses as provided for members of the general assembly who attend interim committee meetings pursuant to section 2-2-307, C.R.S.

Repealed.

The legislative council staff shall be made available to assist the committee in carrying out its duties pursuant to this section.

to (11) Repealed.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 531, § 45.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-45.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-45.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 427, § 68, effective March 26; entire section R&RE, p. 1133, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(1.5) added, p. 1856, § 3, effective August 27.

L. 88:

(1.6) added, p. 1387, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 89, 1st Ex. Sess.:

(1.8) added, p. 62, § 17, effective August 1.

L. 90:

(1) amended and (6) repealed, pp. 1826, 1827, §§ 1, 2, effective March 13.

L. 91:

(1) amended, p. 1107, § 151, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 621, § 1, effective April 14; (7) added, p. 1388, § 4, effective May 25.

L. 97:

(1.9) added, p. 499, § 4, effective August 6.

L. 2000:

(2), (3), and (4) amended and (2.5) added, p. 116, § 4, effective March 15.

L. 2001:

(1.3) added, p. 298, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2005:

(1.6) and (1.8) repealed, p. 291, § 47, effective August 8; (1.9) amended, p. 1069, § 18, effective January 1, 2006.

L. 2007:

(1.3)(b) amended, p. 2050, § 104, effective June 1; (1) amended, p. 341, § 1, effective August 3.

L. 2009:

(1)(d) added, (SB 09-228), ch. 410, p. 2264, § 15, effective July 1; (8) added, (HB 09-1230), ch. 232, p. 1067, § 3, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

(1)(b) and (1.3)(b) amended, (SB 10-213), ch. 375, p. 1765, § 14, effective June 7.

L. 2011:

(1.5) amended, (HB 11-1118), ch. 84, p. 228, § 2, effective March 31.

L. 2015:

(1)(e) added, (HB 15-1173), ch. 189, p. 626, § 1, effective May 13; (9) added, (HB 15-1316), ch. 339, p. 1377, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2019:

(10) added, (HB 19-1023), ch. 239, p. 2365, § 5, effective August 2; (11) added, (HB 19-1207), ch. 202, p. 2173, § 2, effective August 2.

L. 2020:

(1)(b) amended, (SB 20-214), ch. 200, p. 984, § 13, effective June 30; (1)(d) and (9) repealed, (SB 20-136), ch. 70, p. 285, § 16, effective September 14.

43-2-145.5. Transportation legislation review committee - study of revisions to the traffic law - compulsory insurance. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 91:

Entire section added, p. 1403, § 1, effective May 24.

L. 93:

(4) and (6) amended, p. 66, § 1, effective March 22.

L. 94:

(3)(a), (4), and (6) amended and (3)(e) and (3)(f) added, p. 575, § 1, effective April 7; (1)(a) amended, p. 622, § 4, effective April 14; (4) and (6) amended, p. 2539, § 3, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

Subsection (6) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 1996. (See L. 94, p. 2539.)

43-2-146. Highway bypasses - public policy - when.

It is the public policy of the state of Colorado that where the transportation commission has authorized a highway bypass to be built around any incorporated city or town or unincorporated business community of the state of Colorado, the original state highway or state and federal highway markings shall remain on the existing highway through such incorporated city, town, or unincorporated business community and the existing highway shall be maintained, and the new bypass highway shall carry the designation "bypass" or other similar markings.

In all cases where such relocation has been authorized as a part of the national system of interstate and defense highways, the original state highway may be retained as part of the state system or a new and more direct approach road may be constructed to maintain service to such incorporated city, town, or unincorporated business community. In the event a new and more direct approach road is constructed, such approach road shall be placed on the state highway system and the original state highway may be deleted from the state system as provided in section 43-2-106. The markings of the relocated system of highways shall be accomplished in accordance with the practice established under section 42-4-104, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 752, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-46.

L. 61:

p. 647, §§ 1, 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-46.

L. 91:

(1) amended, p. 1108, § 152, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(2) amended, p. 2571, § 98, effective January 1, 1995.